Wyoming statutes. Title 10 Aeronautics
Article 1. Air Taxi Service

§ 10-2-101.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 79, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 182, § 2, pertained to certification for air taxi service.

Laws 2004, ch. 79, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.